Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1452.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 712(c)(5) and 714(e)(1) of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 712. Veterans registry.* * *(c) Duties of department.--The department shall provide access to a paper and an online registry form which contain a statement indicating the purpose for the registry. The forms shall be developed to obtain the following information relating to the veteran:* * *(5) Benefit and program information requests for various benefits and programs for which veterans may be eligible, 123456789101112131415161718 including information pertaining to support resources for military sexual trauma.* * *§ 714. PA VETConnect Program.* * *(e) Duties of department.--The department shall develop and administer the program, which shall contain a mission statement that shall be clearly communicated to network advocates, partners and participants under subsection (b). The department shall:(1) Coordinate with Federal agencies, State agencies, county directors of veterans' affairs, veterans' service organizations, accredited postsecondary educational and technical institutions, the health care provider community, businesses and nonprofit organizations, identified by the department, that provide programs, initiatives, reintegration outreach, support resources for military sexual trauma and related services to veterans and the families of veterans.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1452PN1700 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920